Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 4 Standard Measures

47-4-1.
Dimensions of bushel and half bushel boxes — Marking.

Dimensions. A box which shall measure on the inside thereof seventeen and one-half inches (171/2") by seventeen and one-half inches (171/2") in length and width, and which on the inside thereof shall measure seven and one-sixteenth inches (71/16") in depth, measured from the highest part of the bottom thereof, is hereby declared to be a legal bushel box for the sale of farm produce. A box which shall measure on the inside thereof thirteen by thirteen inches (13" x 13") in length and width and which on the inside thereof shall measure six and one-sixteenth inches (61/16") in depth, measured from the highest part of the bottom thereof, is hereby declared to be a legal half bushel box for the sale of farm produce.

Marking. All bushel boxes of the dimensions specified by this section shall be marked in letters not less than one inch in height with the words “standard bushel for farm produce”. All half bushel boxes of the dimensions specified by this section shall be marked in letters not less than one inch in height with the words “standard half bushel for farm produce”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 27; P.L. 1916, ch. 1387, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

47-4-1

; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 66.

47-4-2.
Weights of bushels, barrels, and tons of specific commodities.

The legal weights of certain commodities in the state of Rhode Island shall be as follows:

A bushel of apples shall weigh forty-eight pounds (48 lbs.).

A bushel of apples, dried, shall weigh twenty-five pounds (25 lbs.).

A bushel of apple seed shall weigh forty pounds (40 lbs.).

A bushel of barley shall weigh forty-eight pounds (48 lbs.).

A bushel of beans shall weigh sixty pounds (60 lbs.).

A bushel of beans, castor, shall weigh forty-six pounds (46 lbs.).

A bushel of beets shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of bran shall weigh twenty pounds (20 lbs.).

A bushel of buckwheat shall weigh forty-eight pounds (48 lbs.).

A bushel of carrots shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of charcoal shall weigh twenty pounds (20 lbs.).

A bushel of clover seed shall weigh sixty pounds (60 lbs.).

A bushel of coal shall weigh eighty pounds (80 lbs.).

A bushel of coke shall weigh forty pounds (40 lbs.).

A bushel of corn, shelled, shall weigh fifty-six pounds (56 lbs.).

A bushel of corn, in the ear, shall weigh seventy pounds (70 lbs.).

A bushel of corn meal shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of cotton seed, upland, shall weigh thirty pounds (30 lbs.).

A bushel of cotton seed, Sea Island, shall weigh forty-four pounds (44 lbs.).

A bushel of flax seed shall weigh fifty-six pounds (56 lbs.).

A bushel of hemp shall weigh forty-four pounds (44 lbs.).

A bushel of Hungarian seed shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of lime shall weigh seventy pounds (70 lbs.).

A bushel of malt shall weigh thirty-eight pounds (38 lbs.).

A bushel of millet seed shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of oats shall weigh thirty-two pounds (32 lbs.).

A bushel of onions shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of parsnips shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of peaches shall weigh forty-eight pounds (48 lbs.).

A bushel of peaches, dried, shall weigh thirty-three pounds (33 lbs.).

A bushel of peas shall weigh sixty pounds (60 lbs.).

A bushel of peas, split, shall weigh sixty pounds (60 lbs.).

A bushel of potatoes shall weigh sixty pounds (60 lbs.).

A bushel of potatoes, sweet, shall weigh fifty-four pounds (54 lbs.).

A bushel of rye shall weigh fifty-six pounds (56 lbs.).

A bushel of rye meal shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of salt, fine, shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of salt, coarse, shall weigh seventy pounds (70 lbs.).

A bushel of timothy seed shall weigh forty-five pounds (45 lbs.).

A bushel of shorts shall weigh twenty pounds (20 lbs.).

A bushel of tomatoes shall weigh fifty-six pounds (56 lbs.).

A bushel of turnips shall weigh fifty pounds (50 lbs.).

A bushel of wheat shall weigh sixty pounds (60 lbs.).

A barrel of flour shall contain one hundred ninety-six pounds (196 lbs.).

A ton of coal, net, shall weigh two thousand pounds (2,000 lbs.).

A ton of coal, gross, shall weigh two thousand two hundred forty pounds (2,240 lbs.).

History of Section.

P.L. 1900, ch. 758, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

47-4-2

.